Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3559
Hospital districts; bonds; interest; rate.

The bonds issued under the provisions of sections 23-3554 to 23-3572 shall draw such interest as shall be agreed upon.

Laws 1967, c. 109, § 6, p. 353;

Laws 1969, c. 51, § 85, p. 329;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.54.